Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.3. Stormwater Management Act.
§ 62.1-44.15:28.
(For expiration date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Development of regulations.

The Board is authorized to adopt regulations that specify minimum technical criteria and administrative procedures for Virginia Stormwater Management Programs. The regulations shall:

Establish standards and procedures for administering a VSMP;

Establish minimum design criteria for measures to control nonpoint source pollution and localized flooding, and incorporate the stormwater management regulations adopted pursuant to the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.), as they relate to the prevention of stream channel erosion. These criteria shall be periodically modified as required in order to reflect current engineering methods;

Require the provision of long-term responsibility for and maintenance of stormwater management control devices and other techniques specified to manage the quality and quantity of runoff;

Require as a minimum the inclusion in VSMPs of certain administrative procedures that include, but are not limited to, specifying the time period within which a VSMP authority shall grant land-disturbing activity approval, the conditions and processes under which approval shall be granted, the procedures for communicating disapproval, the conditions under which an approval may be changed, and requirements for inspection of approved projects;

Establish by regulations a statewide permit fee schedule to cover all costs associated with the implementation of a VSMP related to land-disturbing activities of one acre or greater. Such fee attributes include the costs associated with plan review, VSMP registration statement review, permit issuance, state-coverage verification, inspections, reporting, and compliance activities associated with the land-disturbing activities as well as program oversight costs. The fee schedule shall also include a provision for a reduced fee for land-disturbing activities between 2,500 square feet and up to one acre in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) localities. The fee schedule shall be governed by the following:

The revenue generated from the statewide stormwater permit fee shall be collected utilizing, where practicable, an online payment system, and the Department’s portion shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29

. However, whenever the Board has approved a VSMP, no more than 30 percent of the total revenue generated by the statewide stormwater permit fees collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund, with the balance going to the VSMP authority.

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any general fund appropriation made to the Department or other supporting revenue from a VSMP; however, the fees shall be set at a level sufficient for the Department and the VSMP to fully carry out their responsibilities under this article and its attendant regulations and local ordinances or standards and specifications where applicable. When establishing a VSMP, the VSMP authority shall assess the statewide fee schedule and shall have the authority to reduce or increase such fees, and to consolidate such fees with other program-related charges, but in no case shall such fee changes affect the amount established in the regulations as available to the Department for program oversight responsibilities pursuant to subdivision 5 a. A VSMP’s portion of the fees shall be used solely to carry out the VSMP’s responsibilities under this article and its attendant regulations, ordinances, or annual standards and specifications.

Until July 1, 2014, the fee for coverage under the General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities issued by the Board, or where the Board has issued an individual permit or coverage under the General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities for an entity for which it has approved annual standards and specifications, shall be $750 for each large construction activity with sites or common plans of development equal to or greater than five acres and $450 for each small construction activity with sites or common plans of development equal to or greater than one acre and less than five acres. On and after July 1, 2014, such fees shall only apply where coverage has been issued under the Board’s General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities to a state agency or federal entity for which it has approved annual standards and specifications. After establishment, such fees may be modified in the future through regulatory actions.

Until July 1, 2014, the Department is authorized to assess a $125 reinspection fee for each visit to a project site that was necessary to check on the status of project site items noted to be in noncompliance and documented as such on a prior project inspection.

In establishing the fee schedule under this subdivision, the Department shall ensure that the VSMP authority portion of the statewide permit fee for coverage under the General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities for small construction activity involving a single family detached residential structure with a site or area, within or outside a common plan of development or sale, that is equal to or greater than one acre but less than five acres shall be no greater than the VSMP authority portion of the fee for coverage of sites or areas with a land-disturbance acreage of less than one acre within a common plan of development or sale.

When any fees are collected pursuant to this section by credit cards, business transaction costs associated with processing such payments may be additionally assessed;

The Board may integrate and consolidate components of the regulations implementing the Erosion and Sediment Control program and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area Designation and Management program with the regulations governing the Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) Permit program or repeal components so that these programs may be implemented in a consolidated manner that provides greater consistency, understanding, and efficiency for those regulated by and administering a VSMP.

6.

Establish statewide standards for stormwater management from land-disturbing activities of one acre or greater, except as specified otherwise within this article, and allow for the consolidation in the permit of a comprehensive approach to addressing stormwater management and erosion and sediment control, consistent with the provisions of the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) and this article. However, such standards shall also apply to land-disturbing activity exceeding an area of 2,500 square feet in all areas of the jurisdictions designated as subject to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area Designation and Management Regulations;

7.

Establish a procedure by which a stormwater management plan that is approved for a residential, commercial, or industrial subdivision shall govern the development of the individual parcels, including those parcels developed under subsequent owners;

8.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 5, establish a procedure by which neither a registration statement nor payment of the Department’s portion of the statewide permit fee established pursuant to that subdivision shall be required for coverage under the General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities for construction activity involving a single-family detached residential structure, within or outside a common plan of development or sale;

9.

Provide for the certification and use of a proprietary best management practice only if another state, regional, or national program has verified its nutrient or sediment removal effectiveness and all of such program’s established test protocol requirements were met or exceeded. As used in this subdivision and any regulations or guidance adopted pursuant to this subdivision, “certification” means a determination by the Department that a proprietary best management practice is approved for use in accordance with this article;

10.

Require that VSMPs maintain after-development runoff rate of flow and characteristics that replicate, as nearly as practicable, the existing predevelopment runoff characteristics and site hydrology, or improve upon the contributing share of the existing predevelopment runoff characteristics and site hydrology if stream channel erosion or localized flooding is an existing predevelopment condition. Except where more stringent requirements are necessary to address total maximum daily load requirements or to protect exceptional state waters, any land-disturbing activity that provides for stormwater management shall satisfy the conditions of this subsection if the practices are designed to (i) detain the water quality volume and to release it over 48 hours; (ii) detain and release over a 24-hour period the expected rainfall resulting from the one year, 24-hour storm; and (iii) reduce the allowable peak flow rate resulting from the 1.5-year, two-year, and 10-year, 24-hour storms to a level that is less than or equal to the peak flow rate from the site assuming it was in a good forested condition, achieved through multiplication of the forested peak flow rate by a reduction factor that is equal to the runoff volume from the site when it was in a good forested condition divided by the runoff volume from the site in its proposed condition, and shall be exempt from any flow rate capacity and velocity requirements for natural or man-made channels as defined in any regulations promulgated pursuant to this section or any ordinances adopted pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27

or

62.1-44.15:33

;

11.

Encourage low-impact development designs, regional and watershed approaches, and nonstructural means for controlling stormwater;

12.

Promote the reclamation and reuse of stormwater for uses other than potable water in order to protect state waters and the public health and to minimize the direct discharge of pollutants into state waters;

13.

Establish procedures to be followed when a locality that operates a VSMP wishes to transfer administration of the VSMP to the Department;

14.

Establish a statewide permit fee schedule for stormwater management related to municipal separate storm sewer system permits;

15.

Provide for the evaluation and potential inclusion of emerging or innovative nonproprietary stormwater control technologies that may prove effective in reducing nonpoint source pollution;

16.

Require the owner of property that is zoned for residential use and on which is located a privately owned stormwater management facility serving one or more residential properties to record the long-term maintenance and inspection requirements for such facility with the deed for the owner’s property; and

17.

Require that all final plan elements, specifications, or calculations whose preparation requires a license under Chapter 4 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) or 22 (§

54.1-2200

et seq.) of Title 54.1 be appropriately signed and sealed by a professional who is licensed to engage in practice in the Commonwealth. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize any person to engage in practice outside his area of professional competence.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.4; 1991, c. 84; 2004, c. 372; 2005, c. 102; 2006, c. 21; 2008, c. 405; 2009, c. 709; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598; 2016, cc. 68, 758; 2017, cc. 10, 163; 2020, cc. 313, 667; 2022, c. 32.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:28

.

Editor's note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 4 provides: “That §

62.1-44.15:36

as created by this act shall be repealed upon the effective date of a statewide permit fee schedule adopted pursuant to § 10.1-603.4 by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board prior to July 1, 2013, or pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:28

, as added by this act, by the State Water Control Board on or after July 1, 2013, whichever occurs sooner.” The second contingency was met effective October 23, 2013.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts 2014, cc. 303 and 598, cl. 2 provides: “That amendments to regulations of the State Water Control Board necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.), provided that there is a public comment period of at least 30 days on the proposed amendments prior to Board adoption.”

Acts 2014, cc. 303 and 598, cl. 3 provides: “That the consolidation into Virginia’s General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities of state post-construction requirements exceeding minimum federal requirements shall not be construed to modify the scope of federal agency or citizen suit enforcement pursuant to the Clean Water Act ( 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.).”

Acts 2017, cc. 10 and 163, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act to be effective no later than July 1, 2018. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia). However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action and (ii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2020, c. 667, cl. 2 provides: “That any proprietary best management practice (BMP) that is included by the Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) on the Virginia Stormwater BMP Clearinghouse website prior to July 1, 2020, shall by December 31, 2021, provide documentation to the Department showing that another state, regional, or national certification program has verified and certified its nutrient or sediment removal effectiveness.”

Acts 2020, c. 667, cl. 3 provides: “That any proprietary best management practice (BMP) that fails to provide the Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) with the documentation required by the second enactment of this act shall not be approved for use in any stormwater management plan submitted on or after January 1, 2022, until such proprietary BMP provides the Department with such required documentation.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, Item 377 L 2, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, provides: “Notwithstanding §

62.1-44.15:28

, as it is currently effective and as it shall become effective, Code of Virginia, the permit fee regulations adopted by the State Water Control Board pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:28

, as it is currently effective and as it shall become effective, Code of Virginia, for the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities and municipal separate storm sewer system permits shall be set at an amount representing no less than 60 percent, not to exceed 62 percent, of the direct costs for the administration, compliance and enforcement of Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities and municipal separate storm sewer system permits. To the extent practicable, the Board shall solicit input from affected stakeholders when establishing the new fee structure.”

Acts 2022, c. 32, effective April 1, 2022, provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall prioritize review of any proprietary best management practice (BMP) that was on the Virginia Stormwater BMP Clearinghouse prior to December 31, 2021, and that submits documentation that another state, regional, or national program has verified its nutrient or sediment removal effectiveness and that it met or exceeded all of such program's established test protocol requirements.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 303, effective March 24, 2014, and c. 598, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and added subdivisions A 5 e, A 7, A 8, A 9, and A 13, and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 10 added subdivision A 16 and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 10 and 163, are identical, and added subdivision 19 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 313 inserted subdivision A 16 and renumbered former subdivision A 16 as subdivision A 17.

The 2020 amendment by c. 667, in subdivision A 8, substituted “subdivision 5” for “subdivision A 5”; rewrote subdivision A 9, which read: “Provide for reciprocity with programs in other states for the certification of proprietary best management practices”; and in subdivision A 15, inserted “nonproprietary.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 313 inserted subdivision 19, renumbered former subdivision 19 as subdivision 20, and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 667 rewrote subdivision 12, which read: “Provide for reciprocity with programs in other states for the certification of proprietary best management practices”; and in subdivision 18, inserted “nonproprietary.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 32, effective April 1, 2022, in subdivision A 9, in the first sentence, inserted “certification and,” substituted “national program has verified” for “national certification program has verified and certified” and added “and all of such program's established test protocol requirements were met or exceeded” at the end and added the last sentence.

§ 62.1-44.15:28.
(For effective date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Development of regulations.

The Board is authorized to adopt regulations that establish requirements for the effective control of soil erosion, sediment deposition, and stormwater, including nonagricultural runoff, that shall be met in any VESMP to prevent the unreasonable degradation of properties, stream channels, waters, and other natural resources, and that specify minimum technical criteria and administrative procedures for VESMPs. The regulations shall:

Establish standards and procedures for administering a VESMP;

Establish minimum standards of effectiveness of the VESMP and criteria and procedures for reviewing and evaluating its effectiveness. The minimum standards of program effectiveness established by the Board shall provide that (i) no soil erosion control and stormwater management plan shall be approved until it is reviewed by a plan reviewer certified pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:30

, (ii) each inspection of a land-disturbing activity shall be conducted by an inspector certified pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:30

, and (iii) each VESMP shall contain a program administrator, a plan reviewer, and an inspector, each of whom is certified pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:30

and all of whom may be the same person;

Be based upon relevant physical and developmental information concerning the watersheds and drainage basins of the Commonwealth, including data relating to land use, soils, hydrology, geology, size of land area being disturbed, proximate water bodies and their characteristics, transportation, and public facilities and services;

Include any survey of lands and waters as the Board deems appropriate or as any applicable law requires to identify areas, including multijurisdictional and watershed areas, with critical soil erosion and sediment problems;

Contain conservation standards for various types of soils and land uses, which shall include criteria, techniques, and methods for the control of soil erosion and sediment resulting from land-disturbing activities;

Establish water quality and water quantity technical criteria. These criteria shall be periodically modified as required in order to reflect current engineering methods;

Require the provision of long-term responsibility for and maintenance of stormwater management control devices and other techniques specified to manage the quality and quantity of runoff;

Require as a minimum the inclusion in VESMPs of certain administrative procedures that include, but are not limited to, specifying the time period within which a VESMP authority shall grant land-disturbance approval, the conditions and processes under which such approval shall be granted, the procedures for communicating disapproval, the conditions under which an approval may be changed, and requirements for inspection of approved projects;

Establish a statewide fee schedule to cover all costs associated with the implementation of a VESMP related to land-disturbing activities where permit coverage is required, and for land-disturbing activities where the Board serves as a VESMP authority or VSMP authority. Such fee attributes include the costs associated with plan review, permit registration statement review, permit issuance, permit coverage verification, inspections, reporting, and compliance activities associated with the land-disturbing activities as well as program oversight costs. The fee schedule shall also include a provision for a reduced fee for a land-disturbing activity that disturbs 2,500 square feet or more but less than one acre in an area of a locality designated as a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.). The fee schedule shall be governed by the following:

The revenue generated from the statewide fee shall be collected utilizing, where practicable, an online payment system, and the Department’s portion shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29

. However, whenever the Board has approved a VESMP, no more than 30 percent of the total revenue generated by the statewide fees collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund, with the balance going to the VESMP authority;

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any general fund appropriation made to the Department or other supporting revenue from a VESMP; however, the fees shall be set at a level sufficient for the Department, the Board, and the VESMP to fully carry out their responsibilities under this article and local ordinances or standards and specifications where applicable. When establishing a VESMP, the VESMP authority shall assess the statewide fees pursuant to the schedule and shall have the authority to reduce or increase such fees, and to consolidate such fees with other program-related charges, but in no case shall such fee changes affect the amount established in the regulations as available to the Department for program oversight responsibilities pursuant to subdivision a. A VESMP’s portion of the fees shall be used solely to carry out the VESMP’s responsibilities under this article and associated ordinances;

In establishing the fee schedule under this subdivision, the Department shall ensure that the VESMP authority portion of the statewide fee for coverage under the General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities for small construction activity involving a single-family detached residential structure with a site or area, within or outside a common plan of development or sale, that is equal to or greater than one acre but less than five acres shall be no greater than the VESMP authority portion of the fee for coverage of sites or areas with a land-disturbance acreage of less than one acre within a common plan of development or sale;

When any fees are collected pursuant to this section by credit cards, business transaction costs associated with processing such payments may be additionally assessed;

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subdivision 9, establish a procedure by which neither a registration statement nor payment of the Department’s portion of the statewide fee established pursuant to this subdivision 9 shall be required for coverage under the General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities for construction activity involving a single-family detached residential structure, within or outside a common plan of development or sale;

Establish statewide standards for soil erosion control and stormwater management from land-disturbing activities;

Establish a procedure by which a soil erosion control and stormwater management plan or stormwater management plan that is approved for a residential, commercial, or industrial subdivision shall govern the development of the individual parcels, including those parcels developed under subsequent owners;

Provide for the certification and use of a proprietary best management practice only if another state, regional, or national program has verified its nutrient or sediment removal effectiveness and all of such program’s established test protocol requirements were met or exceeded. As used in this subdivision and any regulations or guidance adopted pursuant to this subdivision, “certification” means a determination by the Department that a proprietary best management practice is approved for use in accordance with this article;

Require that VESMPs maintain after-development runoff rate of flow and characteristics that replicate, as nearly as practicable, the existing predevelopment runoff characteristics and site hydrology, or improve upon the contributing share of the existing predevelopment runoff characteristics and site hydrology if stream channel erosion or localized flooding is an existing predevelopment condition.

Encourage low-impact development designs, regional and watershed approaches, and nonstructural means for controlling stormwater;

Promote the reclamation and reuse of stormwater for uses other than potable water in order to protect state waters and the public health and to minimize the direct discharge of pollutants into state waters;

Establish procedures to be followed when a locality chooses to change the type of program it administers pursuant to subsection D of §

62.1-44.15:27

;

Establish a statewide permit fee schedule for stormwater management related to MS4 permits;

Provide for the evaluation and potential inclusion of emerging or innovative nonproprietary stormwater control technologies that may prove effective in reducing nonpoint source pollution;

Require the owner of property that is zoned for residential use and on which is located a privately owned stormwater management facility serving one or more residential properties to record the long-term maintenance and inspection requirements for such facility with the deed for the owner’s property; and

Require that all final plan elements, specifications, or calculations whose preparation requires a license under Chapter 4 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) or 22 (§

54.1-2200

et seq.) of Title 54.1 be appropriately signed and sealed by a professional who is licensed to engage in practice in the Commonwealth. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize any person to engage in practice outside his area of professional competence.

a.

Except where more stringent requirements are necessary to address total maximum daily load requirements or to protect exceptional state waters, any land-disturbing activity that was subject to the water quantity requirements that were in effect pursuant to this article prior to July 1, 2014, shall be deemed to satisfy the conditions of this subsection if the practices are designed to (i) detain the water volume equal to the first one-half inch of runoff multiplied by the impervious surface of the land development project and to release it over 48 hours; (ii) detain and release over a 24-hour period the expected rainfall resulting from the one year, 24-hour storm; and (iii) reduce the allowable peak flow rate resulting from the 1.5-year, two-year, and 10-year, 24-hour storms to a level that is less than or equal to the peak flow rate from the site assuming it was in a good forested condition, achieved through multiplication of the forested peak flow rate by a reduction factor that is equal to the runoff volume from the site when it was in a good forested condition divided by the runoff volume from the site in its proposed condition. Any land-disturbing activity that complies with these requirements shall be exempt from any flow rate capacity and velocity requirements for natural or man-made channels as defined in any regulations promulgated pursuant to this section or any ordinances adopted pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27

or

62.1-44.15:33

;

b.

Any stream restoration or relocation project that incorporates natural channel design concepts is not a man-made channel and shall be exempt from any flow rate capacity and velocity requirements for natural or man-made channels as defined in any regulations promulgated pursuant to this article;

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.4; 1991, c. 84; 2004, c. 372; 2005, c. 102; 2006, c. 21; 2008, c. 405; 2009, c. 709; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598; 2016, cc. 68, 758; 2017, cc. 10, 163; 2020, cc. 313, 667; contingently amended by 2022, c. 32.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:28

.

§ 62.1-44.15:28.1.
Pollutant removal by dredging.

Upon approval by the Chesapeake Bay Program as a creditable practice for pollutant removal, the Board shall establish a procedure for the approval of dredging operations in the Chesapeake Bay Watershed as a method of meeting pollutant reduction and loading requirements. The dredging operation and disposal of dredged material shall be conducted in compliance with all applicable local, state, and federal laws and regulations. Any locality imposing a fee relating to stormwater pursuant to §

15.2-2114

may make funds available for stormwater maintenance dredging, including at the point of discharge, where stormwater has contributed to the deposition of sediment in state waters.

History.

2015, c. 753.

§ 62.1-44.15:29.
(For expiration date — see notes) Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys collected by the Department pursuant to §§

62.1-44.15:28

,

62.1-44.15:38

, and

62.1-44.15:71

and all civil penalties collected pursuant to §

62.1-44.19:22

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of carrying out the Department’s responsibilities under this article. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

An accounting of moneys received by and distributed from the Fund shall be kept by the State Comptroller.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.4:1; 2012, cc. 748, 785, 808, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:29

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

§ 62.1-44.15:29.
(For effective date — see notes) Virginia Stormwater Management Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys collected by the Department pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:28

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of carrying out the Department’s responsibilities under this article. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

An accounting of moneys received by and distributed from the Fund shall be kept by the State Comptroller.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.4:1; 2012, cc. 748, 785, 808, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:29

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and deleted “62.1-44.15:38, and

62.1-44.15:71

and all civil penalties collected pursuant to §

62.1-44.19:22

” following “62.1-44.15:28.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.